New Jersey, session 221, A3278.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 2 of P.L.2004, c.143 (C.10:6-2) is amended to read as follows: 2.    a.  If a person, whether or not acting under color of law, subjects or causes to be subjected any other person to the deprivation of any substantive due process or equal protection rights, privileges or immunities secured by the Constitution or laws of the United States, or any  substantive rights, privileges or immunities secured by the Constitution or laws of this State, the Attorney General may bring a civil action for damages and for injunctive or other appropriate relief.  The civil action shall be brought in the name of the State and may be brought on behalf of the injured party. If the Attorney General proceeds with and prevails in an action brought pursuant to this subsection, the court shall order the distribution of any award of damages to the injured party and shall award reasonable attorney's fees and costs to the Attorney General.  The penalty provided in subsection e. of this section shall be applicable to a violation of this subsection. b.    If a person, whether or not acting under color of law, interferes or attempts to interfere by threats, intimidation or coercion with the exercise or enjoyment by any other person of any substantive due process or equal protection rights, privileges or immunities secured by the Constitution or laws of the United States, or any substantive rights, privileges or immunities secured by the Constitution or laws of this State, the Attorney General may bring a civil action for damages and for injunctive or other appropriate relief.  The civil action shall be brought in the name of the State and may be brought on behalf of the injured party.  If the Attorney General proceeds with and prevails in an action brought pursuant to this subsection, the court shall order the distribution of any award of damages to the injured party and shall award reasonable attorney's fees and costs to the Attorney General.  The penalty provided in subsection e. of this section shall be applicable to a violation of this subsection. c.    Any person who has been deprived of any substantive due process or equal protection rights, privileges or immunities secured by the Constitution or laws of the United States, or any substantive rights, privileges or immunities secured by the Constitution or laws of this State, or whose exercise or enjoyment of those substantive rights, privileges or immunities has been interfered with or attempted to be interfered with, by threats, intimidation or coercion by a person acting under color of law, may bring a civil action for damages and for injunctive or other appropriate relief.  The penalty provided in subsection e. of this section shall be applicable to a violation of this subsection. d.    (1)  An action brought pursuant to this act may be filed in Superior Court.  Upon application of any party, a jury trial shall be directed. (2)  In a cause of action for the unjustified use of force or deadly force in violation of N.J.S.2C:3-7 or a violation of this act the burden of proof shall be on the public employee or employer to demonstrate that the public employee or employer did not violate a clearly established constitutional or statutory right. e.    Any person who deprives, interferes or attempts to interfere by threats, intimidation or coercion with the exercise or enjoyment by any other person of any substantive due process or equal protection rights, privileges or immunities secured by the Constitution or laws of the United States, or any substantive rights, privileges or immunities secured by the Constitution or laws of this State is liable for a civil penalty for each violation.  The court or jury, as the case may be, shall determine the appropriate amount of the penalty.  Any money collected by the court in payment of a civil penalty shall be conveyed to the State Treasurer for deposit into the State General Fund. f.     In addition to any damages, civil penalty, injunction or other appropriate relief awarded in an action brought pursuant to subsection c. of this section, the court may award the prevailing party reasonable attorney's fees and costs. (cf:  P.L.2004, c.143, s.2) 2.    R.S.59:3-3 is amended to read as follows: a.    A public employee is not liable if he acts in good faith in the execution or  enforcement of any law. b.    Nothing in this section [exonerates] shall exonerate a public employee from liability for: (1)  false arrest or false imprisonment; or (2)  unjustified use of force or deadly force in violation of N.J.S.2C:3-7 or the use of force guidelines promulgated by the Attorney General. c.    It shall not be a defense pursuant to this section with respect to any cause of action for unjustified use of force or deadly force in violation of N.J.S.2C:3-7 or a violation of the "New Jersey Civil Rights Act," P.L.2004, c.143 (C.10:6-1 et seq.), that the plaintiffs rights, privileges, or immunities were not clearly established at the time of their deprivation. (cf:  PL.1972, c. 45, s.3) 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.